Tennessee, session 114, HB2197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-130(b), is amended by deleting
subdivision (3) and substituting:
(3) Prior to submitting the application necessary to obtain a license, certification,
or registration, an individual may request in writing or electronically a notice from the
licensing authority from which the individual seeks to obtain a license, certification, or
registration concerning the individual's qualification to obtain the license, certificate, or
registration, based on the individual's criminal history. If the licensing authority
determines that an individual is disqualified due to the individual's criminal history, the
licensing authority must provide the individual with a written notification that sets forth
the reasons for its determination and its justification in accordance with subdivision
(b)(4)(A). The notice as to the individual's qualifications to obtain a license, certificate, or
registration must be limited to the individual's criminal history and should not be
construed as prohibiting the licensing authority from denying an application on other
grounds. This determination applies exclusively to the individual and is not an advisory
or formal opinion of the licensing authority.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-130(c), is amended by deleting
"written" and substituting "written or electronic".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2197
012236
- 1 -